Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.330

Notice to alien property custodian.

In any court or administrative action or proceeding within this state, involving property within this state or any interest therein, in which service of process is required to be made upon or notice thereof given to any person who is in a designated enemy country or enemy-occupied territory, in addition to the service of process upon or giving of notice to the person as required by any law, statute or rule applicable to the action or proceeding, a copy of the process or notice shall be sent by registered mail to the alien property custodian, Washington, District of Columbia.

[ 1943 c 62 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 254-1.]